West Virginia, session 2025, HB2360.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 11. GENERAL PROVISIONS CONCERNING CRIMES. §61-11-27. Definition of law-enforcement officer. For purposes of §61-2-10b, §61-5-17, and §61-5-17a, "law-enforcement officer" has the same definition as this term is defined in §30-29-1 and shall additionally include individuals defined as "chief executive", "law-enforcement official", and "pre-certified law-enforcement officer" in §30-29-1. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home